Utah statutes.
31A-5-410.   Supervision of management changes.

(1) (a) Immediately after the selection of a person as a director or principal officer, the insurer shall report to the commissioner:

(i)  the name of the person selected as a director or principal officer of a corporation; and

(ii)  pertinent biographical and other data that the commissioner requires by rule.

(b)  For five years after the initial issuance of a certificate of authority to a corporation, the commissioner may, within 30 days after receipt of a report under Subsection (1)(a), disapprove any person selected who fails to satisfy the commissioner that the person:

(i)  is trustworthy; and

(ii)  has the competence and experience necessary to discharge that person's responsibilities.

(2) (a)  Whenever a director or principal officer of a corporation is removed under a provision listed in Subsection (2)(b), the insurer shall immediately report to the commissioner:

(i)  the removal; and

(ii)  a statement of the reasons for the removal.

(b)  Subsection (2)(a) applies to a removal under:

(i)  Subsection 16-6a-820(4);

(ii)  Section 16-10a-808;

(iii)  Section 16-10a-832; and

(iv)  Subsection 31A-5-409(4).

(3) The commissioner may order the removal of a director or officer if the commissioner finds, after a hearing, that:

(a)  a director or officer:

(i)  is incompetent;

(ii)  untrustworthy;

(iii)  is not qualified under Section 31A-5-409; or

(iv)  has wilfully violated:

(A)  this title;

(B)  a rule adopted under Subsection 31A-2-201(3); or

(C)  an order issued under Subsection 31A-2-201(4); and

(b)  the circumstances described in Subsection (3)(a) endangers the interests of:

(i)  insureds; or

(ii)  the public.

